Tennessee, session 114, HB0925.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-1-106, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
(g) Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, a member of the general
assembly is entitled to expense and mileage allowances in accordance with this section
for a Saturday or Sunday during a regular or special session if the member is arriving on
such day to attend, or in anticipation of attending, a meeting germane to the business of
the general assembly for the regular or special session.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect November 3, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0925
002509
- 1 -